Illinois, session 104th, SB2041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 804 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/804)  (from Ch. 120, par. 8-804)7    Sec. 804. Failure to pay estimated tax. 8    (a) In general. In case of any underpayment of estimated 9tax by a taxpayer, except as provided in subsection (d) or (e), 10the taxpayer shall be liable to a penalty in an amount 11determined at the rate prescribed by Section 3-3 of the 12Uniform Penalty and Interest Act upon the amount of the 13underpayment (determined under subsection (b)) for each 14required installment.15    (b) Amount of underpayment. For purposes of subsection 16(a), the amount of the underpayment shall be the excess of:17        (1) the amount of the installment which would be 18    required to be paid under subsection (c), over19        (2) the amount, if any, of the installment paid on or 20    before the last date prescribed for payment.21    (c) Amount of Required Installments.22        (1) Amount.23            (A) In General. Except as provided in paragraphs   SB2041- 2 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1        (2) and (3), the amount of any required installment 2        shall be 25% of the required annual payment.3            (B) Required Annual Payment. For purposes of 4        subparagraph (A), the term "required annual payment" 5        means the lesser of: 6                (i) 90% of the tax shown on the return for the 7            taxable year, or if no return is filed, 90% of the 8            tax for such year;9                (ii) for installments due prior to February 1, 10            2011, and after January 31, 2012, 100% of the tax 11            shown on the return of the taxpayer for the 12            preceding taxable year if a return showing a 13            liability for tax was filed by the taxpayer for 14            the preceding taxable year and such preceding year 15            was a taxable year of 12 months; or16                (iii) for installments due after January 31, 17            2011, and prior to February 1, 2012, 150% of the 18            tax shown on the return of the taxpayer for the 19            preceding taxable year if a return showing a 20            liability for tax was filed by the taxpayer for 21            the preceding taxable year and such preceding year 22            was a taxable year of 12 months; or . 23                (iv) 90% of the tax for the taxable year that 24            would have been due based on this Act as it exists 25            on the first day of the taxable year. 26        (2) Lower Required Installment where Annualized Income   SB2041- 3 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1    Installment is Less Than Amount Determined Under Paragraph 2    (1).3            (A) In General. In the case of any required 4        installment if a taxpayer establishes that the 5        annualized income installment is less than the amount 6        determined under paragraph (1),7                (i) the amount of such required installment 8            shall be the annualized income installment, and9                (ii) any reduction in a required installment 10            resulting from the application of this 11            subparagraph shall be recaptured by increasing the 12            amount of the next required installment determined 13            under paragraph (1) by the amount of such 14            reduction, and by increasing subsequent required 15            installments to the extent that the reduction has 16            not previously been recaptured under this clause.17            (B) Determination of Annualized Income 18        Installment. In the case of any required installment, 19        the annualized income installment is the excess, if 20        any, of: 21                (i) an amount equal to the applicable 22            percentage of the tax for the taxable year 23            computed by placing on an annualized basis the net 24            income for months in the taxable year ending 25            before the due date for the installment, over26                (ii) the aggregate amount of any prior   SB2041- 4 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1            required installments for the taxable year.2            (C) Applicable Percentage.3        In the case of the followingThe applicable4        required installments:percentage is: 5        1st ..............................22.5%6        2nd ...............................45%7        3rd ...............................67.5%8        4th ...............................90%9            (D) Annualized Net Income; Individuals. For 10        individuals, net income shall be placed on an 11        annualized basis by:12                (i) multiplying by 12, or in the case of a 13            taxable year of less than 12 months, by the number 14            of months in the taxable year, the net income 15            computed without regard to the standard exemption 16            for the months in the taxable year ending before 17            the month in which the installment is required to 18            be paid;19                (ii) dividing the resulting amount by the 20            number of months in the taxable year ending before 21            the month in which such installment date falls; 22            and23                (iii) deducting from such amount the standard 24            exemption allowable for the taxable year, such 25            standard exemption being determined as of the last 26            date prescribed for payment of the installment.  SB2041- 5 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1            (E) Annualized Net Income; Corporations. For 2        corporations, net income shall be placed on an 3        annualized basis by multiplying by 12 the taxable 4        income 5                (i) for the first 3 months of the taxable 6            year, in the case of the installment required to 7            be paid in the 4th month,8                (ii) for the first 3 months or for the first 5 9            months of the taxable year, in the case of the 10            installment required to be paid in the 6th month,11                (iii) for the first 6 months or for the first 8 12            months of the taxable year, in the case of the 13            installment required to be paid in the 9th month, 14            and15                (iv) for the first 9 months or for the first 11 16            months of the taxable year, in the case of the 17            installment required to be paid in the 12th month 18            of the taxable year,19        then dividing the resulting amount by the number of 20        months in the taxable year (3, 5, 6, 8, 9, or 11 as the 21        case may be).22        (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 23    subsection (c), in the case of a federally regulated 24    exchange that elects to apportion its income under Section 25    304(c-1) of this Act, the amount of each required 26    installment due prior to June 30 of the first taxable year   SB2041- 6 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1    to which the election applies shall be 25% of the tax that 2    would have been shown on the return for that taxable year 3    if the taxpayer had not made such election. 4    (d) Exceptions. Notwithstanding the provisions of the 5preceding subsections, the penalty imposed by subsection (a) 6shall not be imposed if the taxpayer was not required to file 7an Illinois income tax return for the preceding taxable year, 8or, for individuals, if the taxpayer had no tax liability for 9the preceding taxable year and such year was a taxable year of 1012 months. The penalty imposed by subsection (a) shall also 11not be imposed on any underpayments of estimated tax due 12before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1998 which 13underpayments are solely attributable to the change in 14apportionment from subsection (a) to subsection (h) of Section 15304. The provisions of this amendatory Act of 1998 apply to tax 16years ending on or after December 31, 1998.17    (e) The penalty imposed for underpayment of estimated tax 18by subsection (a) of this Section shall not be imposed to the 19extent that the Director or his or her designate determines, 20pursuant to Section 3-8 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest 21Act that the penalty should not be imposed.22    (f) Definition of tax. For purposes of subsections (b) and 23(c), the term "tax" means the excess of the tax imposed under 24Article 2 of this Act, over the amounts credited against such 25tax under Sections 601(b) (3) and (4).26    (g) Application of Section in case of tax withheld under   SB2041- 7 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1Article 7. For purposes of applying this Section: 2        (1) tax withheld from compensation for the taxable 3    year shall be deemed a payment of estimated tax, and an 4    equal part of such amount shall be deemed paid on each 5    installment date for such taxable year, unless the 6    taxpayer establishes the dates on which all amounts were 7    actually withheld, in which case the amounts so withheld 8    shall be deemed payments of estimated tax on the dates on 9    which such amounts were actually withheld;10        (2) amounts timely paid by a partnership, Subchapter S 11    corporation, or trust on behalf of a partner, shareholder, 12    or beneficiary pursuant to subsection (f) of Section 502 13    or Section 709.5 and claimed as a payment of estimated tax 14    shall be deemed a payment of estimated tax made on the last 15    day of the taxable year of the partnership, Subchapter S 16    corporation, or trust for which the income from the 17    withholding is made was computed; and18        (3) all other amounts pursuant to Article 7 shall be 19    deemed a payment of estimated tax on the date the payment 20    is made to the taxpayer of the amount from which the tax is 21    withheld. 22    (g-5) Amounts withheld under the State Salary and Annuity 23Withholding Act. An individual who has amounts withheld under 24paragraph (10) of Section 4 of the State Salary and Annuity 25Withholding Act may elect to have those amounts treated as 26payments of estimated tax made on the dates on which those   SB2041- 8 -LRB104 08342 HLH 18393 b1amounts are actually withheld.2    (i) Short taxable year. The application of this Section to 3taxable years of less than 12 months shall be in accordance 4with regulations prescribed by the Department.5    The changes in this Section made by Public Act 84-127 6shall apply to taxable years ending on or after January 1, 71986.8(Source: P.A. 96-1496, eff. 1-13-11; 97-507, eff. 8-23-11; 997-636, eff. 6-1-12.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.